Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-930
Self-funded insurer; violation; civil penalty.

The department may impose and collect a civil penalty on a self-funded insurer who violates the requirements of section 68-928 if the department finds that the self-funded insurer:

(1) Committed the violation flagrantly and in conscious disregard of the requirements; or

(2) Has committed violations with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in that type of conduct.

The civil penalty shall not be more than one thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of thirty thousand dollars, unless the violation by the self-funded insurer was committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of section 68-928, in which case the penalty shall not be more than fifteen thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

Laws 2005, LB 589, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-10,104;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 258.